District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3505

Prosecutions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 17, 1941, 55 Stat. 810, ch. 589, § 4
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 16(c), 41 DCR 1639
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 216, 56 DCR 7413

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3305.
1973 Ed., § 22-3305.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).